Colorado statutes. TITLE 30 Government - County
PART 3
OIL, GAS, AND MINERAL RIGHTS

30-11-301. Definitions.

As used in this part 3, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Landfill-generated methane gas" means those gases resulting from the biological decomposition of landfilled solid wastes, including methane, carbon dioxide, hydrogen, and traces of other gases, and shall be referred to in this part 3 as "landfill gas".

(1.5) "Oil and gas" means oil, gas, casinghead gas, condensate, and hydrocarbons or any one or more of them.

"Real estate owned by a county" and "county lands" means any real estate acquired and owned by a county under the laws relating to taxation or otherwise.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 328, § 5.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25(5).

CRS 53:

§ 36-11-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-11-5.

L. 80:

(1) amended and (1.5) added, p. 651, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For definitions applicable to this article, see § 30-26-301 (2)(d).

30-11-302. Oil, gas, and mineral rights - reservation of - sale.

In any sale of county lands made by any county acting through its board of county commissioners, a valid reservation of oil and gas and other minerals in such lands may be made when in the opinion of the board of county commissioners it is deemed to be for the best interest of the county. Oil and gas and other mineral rights or any of them thus reserved by a county upon the sale of such real estate may be sold by order of the board of county commissioners at public sale to the highest and best bidder after four weeks' prior notice by publication two times in a newspaper of general circulation in the county in which the land is situated, said notice to describe the oil and gas or other mineral rights to be sold, the location of the land involved, and the date, time, and place of such sale; but a copy of said notice shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the board of county commissioners to the owner of the surface at the time of such notice as shown by the records in the office of the county assessor of the county in which such lands are situated at the last known address of such owner as shown by said books of the county assessor, and that a copy of said notice shall be mailed, postage prepaid, by the board of county commissioners to the person in possession of the surface.

In the sale of reserved oil and gas rights under any tract of land, the number of acres contained in any one parcel or unit of sale of such rights shall not exceed the total number of acres of such surface land sold by the county to the purchaser thereof at the time of reservation therefrom of the oil and gas rights thus offered for sale. Nothing contained in this section shall prevent a county from selling any number of such units or parcels at any public sale. The board of county commissioners has the right to reject any and all bids.

Mineral rights, other than oil and gas, reserved as provided in this section may be leased for exploration, development, and production purposes upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed and contracted by the board of county commissioners in the exercise of its best judgment and as such board deems to be for the best interests of the county. Any such lease of mineral rights, other than oil and gas, shall be for a term not to exceed twenty-five years and as long thereafter as such minerals are produced. Leases of any such mineral rights made or entered into by the board in conformity with the provisions of this section prior to February 25, 1955, are hereby confirmed, validated, and declared to be legal and valid insofar as the authority of any such board is concerned.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 326, § 1.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25(1).

CRS 53:

§ 36-11-1.

L. 55:

p. 255, § 1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-11-1.

30-11-303. Oil and gas rights - leases - royalties.

Any county acting by its board of county commissioners may lease any real estate or any interest therein owned by the county for oil and gas exploration, development, and production purposes upon such terms and conditions as may be prescribed and contracted by the board of county commissioners in the exercise of its best judgment, and as such board deems to be for the best interests of the county.

Any such lease of oil and gas rights shall be for a term not to exceed five years and as long thereafter as oil or gas is produced and shall provide for a royalty of not less than twelve and one-half percent of all oil and gas produced, saved, and marketed, or the equivalent market value thereof, which royalty may be reduced proportionately under appropriate provision in such lease if the interest of the county is less than a full interest in the land or oil and gas rights in the land described in such lease.

When, in the opinion of the board of county commissioners and because of the size, shape, or current use of any tract of county real estate, the public interest so requires, any lease of such tract may provide that no drilling shall be conducted on the land covered thereby, in which case such lease shall be for a term not to exceed ten years and so long thereafter as the county may share in royalties payable on account of production of oil or gas from lands adjacent to such tract of county land so leased.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 327, § 2.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25(2).

L. 53:

p. 218, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 36-11-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-11-2.

30-11-304. Agreements to pool lands for production purposes.

When deemed by the board of county commissioners to be in the best interest of the county, any county acting by its board of county commissioners may enter into any unit agreement providing for the pooling or consolidation of acreage covered by any oil and gas lease executed by such county with other acreage for oil and gas exploration, development, and production purposes and providing for the apportionment or allocation of royalties among the separate tracts of land included in such unit agreement on an acreage or other equitable basis, and may by such agreement, with the consent of its lessee, change any and all of the provisions of any lease issued by such county including the term of years for which such lease was originally granted in order to conform such lease to the terms and provisions of such unit agreement and to facilitate the efficient and economic production of oil and gas from the unit lands.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 327, § 3.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25(3).

CRS 53:

§ 36-11-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-11-3.

30-11-305. Prior agreements validated.

All reservations of oil and gas and other mineral rights and sales of previously reserved oil and gas and other mineral rights in county lands made or entered into by any county prior to May 20, 1949, acting by its board of county commissioners, all leases of oil and gas or rights, and all unit agreements relating to or dealing with oil and gas and containing provisions similar to those set forth in section 30-11-304, affecting county lands, made or entered into by any county prior to May 20, 1949, acting by its board of county commissioners are hereby confirmed, validated, and declared to be legal and valid in all respects.

Source:

L. 49:

p. 327, § 4.

CSA:

C. 45, § 25(4).

CRS 53:

§ 36-11-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 36-11-4.

30-11-306. Legislative declaration concerning landfill gas.

The general assembly hereby declares that landfill gas constitutes a hazard to the health, welfare, and safety of the people of this state, whether such gas has accumulated as a result of a public or private landfill operation, and that the extraction of landfill gas will ameliorate this dangerous condition, and further declares that the development of landfill gas will provide a valuable, alternate energy resource to the citizens of this state. In order to diminish this hazard and utilize this energy resource, the powers of counties are hereby expanded to authorize landfill gas exploration, development, and production; the financing thereof; the marketing and sale of landfill gas to any public or private person or entity; and the county use thereof for any purpose.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 651, § 3, effective July 1.

30-11-307. County authority relating to landfill gas.

To accomplish the purposes specified in section 30-11-306, counties are granted the following powers:

To acquire, hold, use, transfer, and convey any real property or any interest therein for purposes of landfill gas exploration, production, and development;

To engage in any and all activities respecting the exploration, development, production, distribution, marketing, and sale of landfill gas to any person or public or private entity, or for county uses;

To acquire by gift, purchase, or condemnation necessary easements and rights-of-way, for ingress and egress and for the installation of facilities related to collection and distribution of landfill gas; except that the power of condemnation granted in this paragraph (c) shall not extend to acquisition of landfill gas in place nor shall such power be available to a county until the county has entered into a contract with the owner of such landfill gas for the development, extraction, and purchase of such landfill gas, and except that such condemnation shall not interfere with the normal use of any real property, or other property appurtenant thereto, which is devoted or dedicated to a public utility use or upon which landfill gas abatement or recovery facilities have been placed in operation and shall be limited to the maximum reasonable width or area necessary to install, operate, and maintain such rights-of-way, ingress and egress, and collection and distribution facilities.

Any interest in real property acquired by condemnation pursuant to this paragraph (c) shall terminate upon the completion of use of such real property, or any interest therein, for landfill gas operations, and any such condemnation shall be in the manner provided in part 1 of article 6 of title 38, C.R.S.

To enter into contracts, including intergovernmental contracts, and to perform all acts necessary to produce, distribute, and market landfill gas;

To issue general obligation bonds, after approval of the qualified electors of the county, for purposes of financing the exploration, development, production, distribution, and marketing of landfill gas;

To issue revenue bonds authorized by action of the board of county commissioners, without the approval of the qualified electors of the county, for purposes of financing the exploration, development, production, distribution, and marketing of landfill gas. Such revenue bonds shall be issued in the manner provided in part 4 of article 35 of title 31, C.R.S., for the issuance of revenue bonds by municipalities; except that such revenue bonds may be sold in one or more series at par, or below or above par, at public or private sale, in such manner and for such price as the county, in its discretion, shall determine. Such revenue bonds and interest coupons, if any, appurtenant thereto shall never constitute the debt or indebtedness of the county within the meaning of any provision or limitation of the state constitution or statutes, and shall not constitute nor give rise to a pecuniary liability of the county or a charge against its general credit or taxing powers, and such revenue bonds and the income therefrom are exempt from taxation, except inheritance, estate, and transfer taxes.

Source:

L. 80:

Entire section added, p. 652, § 3, effective July 1.

Cross references:

For municipal provisions concerning landfill gas, see §§ 31-15-715 and 31-15-716.